Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 135.230 to
135.290.
SECTION 2. (1) The presiding judge of a judicial district shall enter a standing  pretrial
release order specifying to the sheriff  of the county, or to the entity supervising the local
correctional facility responsible for pretrial incarceration within  the judicial district, those
persons and offenses:
(a) Subject to release on recognizance;
(b) Subject to release with special conditions as specified in the order; and
(c) That are not eligible for release until arraignment.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, with input from a criminal justice advisory
committee appointed by the Chief Justice,  shall establish release guidelines for the pretrial
release orders described in this section to:
(a) Provide consistent release decision-making structure across the state;
(b) Reduce reliance on the use of security;
(c) Include provisions for victim notification and input; and
(d) Balance the rights of the defendant and presumption of pretrial release against com-
munity and victim safety and the risk of failure to appear.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 135.235 is amended to read:
135.235. (1)  [ If directed by the ] A  presiding judge for a judicial district[ , a release assistance of-
ficer, and release assistance deputies who shall be responsible to the  release assistance officer, shall
be appointed ] may appoint  release assistance officers  under a personnel plan established by the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
(2) [ The] A  release assistance officer  shall, except when impracticable, interview every person
detained pursuant to law and charged with an offense. If the person is charged with a person
felony or person Class A misdemeanor, as those terms are defined in the  rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission, or with contempt of court for violating a court order protect-
ing or  prohibiting contact with another person, the release assistance officer shall make
reasonable efforts to contact the victim prior  to submitting a report or making a release
Enrolled Senate Bill 48 (SB 48-C) Page 1
decision under subsection (3) of this section.  If the release assistance officer is able to con-
tact the victim:
(a) Information regarding the victim’s position on release, including whether special re-
lease conditions should be imposed, must be included in the report  described in subsection
(3) of this section, and considered  by the release assistance officer if the officer makes the
release decision; and
(b) If the information is available, the release assistance officer shall  inform the victim
of the location, date and time of the defendant’s arraignment or other first appearance.
(3) The release assistance officer shall verify release criteria information and may either:
(a) Timely  submit a written report to the magistrate containing, but not limited to, an evaluation
of the release criteria and a recommendation for the form of release; or
(b) If delegated release authority by the presiding judge for the judicial district, make the re-
lease decision.
(4) As used in this section, “victim” means an  individual that the charging instrument
indicates is  the victim of the alleged offense or the person protected by the court order,
whether or not the individual is specifically named,  so long as the release assistance officer
is able to confirm the identity of the individual.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 135.240 is amended to read:
135.240. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)[ ,] and (4) [ and (5)] of this section,  a defendant
shall be released in accordance with ORS 135.230 to 135.290.
(2)(a) When the defendant is charged with murder, aggravated murder  or treason, release shall
be denied when the proof is evident or the presumption strong that the person is guilty.
(b) When the defendant is charged with murder or aggravated  murder and the proof is not evi-
dent nor the presumption strong that the defendant is guilty, the court shall determine the issue of
release as provided in subsection (4) of this section. In determining the issue of  release under sub-
section (4) of this section, the  court may consider any evidence used in making the determination
required by this subsection.
(3) The magistrate may conduct such hearing as the magistrate considers necessary to determine
whether, under subsection (2) of this section, the proof is evident or  the presumption strong that the
person is guilty.
(4)(a) [ Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of  this section, ] When the defendant is
charged with a violent felony, release shall be denied if the court finds:
(A) Except  when the defendant is charged by indictment, that there is probable cause to believe
that the defendant committed the crime; and
(B) By clear and convincing evidence, that there is a  danger of physical injury or sexual
victimization to the victim or members of the public by the defendant while on release.
(b) If the defendant wants to have  a hearing on the issue of release, the defendant must request
the hearing at the time of arraignment in circuit court. If the  defendant requests a release hearing,
the court must hold the hearing within five days of the request.
(c) At the release  hearing, unless the state stipulates to the setting of security or release, the
court shall make the inquiry set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection. The state has  the burden
of producing evidence at the release hearing subject to ORS 40.015 (4).
(d) The defendant may be represented by counsel and may present evidence on  any relevant is-
sue. However, the hearing may not be used for purposes of discovery.
(e) If the court determines that the defendant is eligible for  release in accordance with this
subsection, the court shall set security or other appropriate conditions of release.
(f) When a defendant who has been released violates a condition of release and the violation:
(A) Constitutes a  new criminal offense, the court shall cause the defendant to be taken back into
custody and shall order the defendant held pending trial without release.
(B) Does not constitute a  new criminal offense, the court may order the defendant to be taken
back into custody[ ,] and may order the defendant held pending trial [ and may set a security amount
of not less than $250,000 ] or may make a new release decision .
Enrolled Senate Bill 48 (SB 48-C) Page 2
[(5)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court shall set a security  amount of not less
than $50,000 for a defendant charged with an offense listed in ORS 137.700 or 137.707  unless the court
determines that amount to be unconstitutionally excessive, and may not release the defendant  on any
form of release other than a security release if: ]
[(A) The United States Constitution or the Oregon  Constitution prohibits the denial of release un-
der subsection (4) of this section; ]
[(B) The court determines that the  defendant is eligible for release under subsection (4) of this
section; or]
[(C) The court finds that the offense is not a violent felony. ]
[(b) In addition to the security amount described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court may
impose any supervisory conditions deemed  necessary for the protection of the victim and the community.
When a defendant who has been released violates a condition of release and the violation: ]
[(A) Constitutes a new criminal offense, the court shall cause the defendant to be taken  back into
custody, shall order the defendant held pending  trial and shall set a security amount of not less than
$250,000.]
[(B) Does not constitute a new criminal offense, the court may order  the defendant to be taken back
into custody, may  order the defendant held pending trial and may set a security amount of not less than
$250,000.]
[(6)] (5) For purposes of this section, “violent felony” means a felony offense in which there was
an actual or threatened serious physical injury to the victim, or a felony sexual offense.
SECTION 5.  ORS 135.245 is amended to read:
135.245. (1) Except as  provided in ORS 135.240, a person in custody has the right to [ immediate
security release or to ] be taken before a magistrate without  undue delay. [ If the person is not released
under ORS 135.270, or otherwise released before arraignment,  the magistrate shall advise the person
of the right of the person to a security release as provided in ORS 135.265. ]
[(2) If a person in custody does not  request a security release at the time of arraignment, the
magistrate shall make a release decision regarding the person within 48 hours after the arraignment. ]
(2)(a) A magistrate shall make a release decision at the time of  arraignment or other
first appearance after the defendant is  taken into custody unless good cause to postpone the
release decision is shown, in which case a release hearing shall be held pursuant to sub-
section (7) of this section.
(b) The district attorney shall make reasonable efforts to inform the victim  of the lo-
cation, date and time of the arraignment  or other first appearance and to determine if the
victim is present at the arraignment or appearance. If the  victim is present, the victim has
the right to reasonably express any views relevant to the issues at the appearance.
(c) As used in this subsection, “good cause” includes circumstances in which:
(A) The district attorney plans to seek preventative detention; or
(B) There is a reasonable belief that additional evidence exists and would be  relevant to
the release decision, but is not currently available.
(3) If the magistrate, having given priority to  the primary release criteria, decides to release a
defendant or  to set security, the magistrate shall impose the least onerous condition reasonably
likely to ensure the safety of the public and the victim and the person’s later appearance and, if the
person is charged with an offense  involving domestic violence, ensure that the person does not en-
gage in domestic violence while on release. A person in custody, otherwise having a right  to re-
lease, shall be released upon the personal recognizance unless:
(a) Release criteria show  to the satisfaction of the magistrate that such a release is unwar-
ranted; or
(b) Subsection (6) of this section applies to the person.
(4) Upon a finding that release of the person on personal  recognizance is unwarranted, the
magistrate shall [ impose either ] proceed to consider  conditional release [ or security  release. ] under
ORS 135.260. Only after determining that conditional release is unwarranted, or if  otherwise
Enrolled Senate Bill 48 (SB 48-C) Page 3
required by ORS 135.230 to 135.290, may the  magistrate proceed to consider security release
under ORS 135.265.
(5) At the release hearing:
(a) The district attorney has a right to be  heard in relation to issues relevant to the release
decision; and
(b) The victim has the right:
(A) Upon request made within the time period prescribed in the notice required by  ORS 147.417,
to be notified by the district attorney of the release hearing;
(B) To appear personally at the hearing; and
(C) If present, to reasonably express any views relevant to the issues before the magistrate.
(6) If a person refuses to provide a true name under the circumstances  described in ORS 135.060
and 135.065, the magistrate may not release the  person on personal recognizance or on conditional
release. The magistrate may release the person on security release under ORS 135.265 except that
the magistrate shall require the person to deposit the full security amount set by the magistrate.
(7)(a) After the postponement of a release decision  under subsection (2) of this section,
upon the request of either party, or upon the magistrate’s own motion,  the magistrate shall
make a release decision or reconsider the release decision, as applicable, at a release hearing.
The release hearing  must be held within 48 hours of arraignment or other first appearance
after the defendant is  taken into custody unless both parties agree, or the court finds good
cause, to hold the  hearing at a later time. Under no circumstances may the release hearing
be held more than five days after arraignment or other first appearance  after the defendant
is taken into custody unless the defendant consents to holding the hearing at a later time.
(b) A hearing held under this subsection may not be used for purposes of discovery.
[(7)] (8)  This section shall be  liberally construed to carry out the purpose of relying upon
criminal sanctions instead of financial loss to [ assure] ensure the appearance of the defendant.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 135.247 is amended to read:
135.247. (1) When a release assistance officer [ or a release  assistance deputy ] makes a release
decision under ORS 135.235 involving a defendant charged with a sex crime  or a crime constituting
domestic violence, the release assistance officer [ or deputy ] shall include in the decision  an order
that the defendant be prohibited from contacting or attempting to contact the victim, either  directly
or through a third party, while the defendant is in custody. The release assistance officer  [ or
deputy] shall provide the defendant with a written copy of the order.
(2) When a defendant who is charged with a sex crime or  a crime that constitutes domestic vi-
olence is arraigned, the court shall enter an order continuing an order  issued under subsection (1)
of this section or, if no such order has been entered, enter an order prohibiting the defendant  from
contacting or attempting to contact the victim, either directly  or through a third party, while the
defendant is in custody.
(3) Except as  provided in subsection (4) of this section, an order described in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section:
(a) Shall apply at any time during which the defendant is held in custody on the charge; and
(b) Shall remain valid until the defendant is sentenced for the crime, the  charge is dismissed or
the defendant is acquitted of the crime.
(4) Upon petition  of the victim, the court may enter an order terminating an order entered under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section if the court  finds, after a hearing on the petition, that termi-
nating the order is in the best interests of the parties and the community.
(5) An order described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not limit  contact with the
victim by the defense attorney, or an agent  of the defense attorney other than the defendant, in the
manner prescribed by ORS 135.970 (2).
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic violence” has the meaning given that term in ORS 135.230.
(b) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 7.
ORS 135.242 is repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 48 (SB 48-C) Page 4
SECTION 8.  If House Bill 3273 becomes law, section 1, chapter , Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 3273), is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 192.311  to 192.478, a law enforcement agency may not release
a booking photo except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A law enforcement agency  may release a booking photo described in subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) To the person depicted in the booking photo;
(b) To another law enforcement  agency, or to a law enforcement officer employed by another
law enforcement agency, for a law enforcement purpose;
(c) To the public, if the law enforcement agency determines that there  is a law enforcement
purpose for the release, including but not limited to assistance with the apprehension  of a fugitive
or a suspect in a criminal investigation, or the identification of additional criminal activity;
(d) To a state mental hospital upon the  admission to the hospital of the person depicted in the
booking  photo;
(e) To a party  in a criminal proceeding resulting from the arrest during which the booking photo
was obtained;
(f) To the victim of the offense for which the person depicted in  the booking photo was arrested;
[or]
(g) To the court, if the booking photo is  part of a pretrial release report or is provided
to the court as part of the pretrial  release process for the purposes of confirming the iden-
tity of a defendant; or
[(g)] (h)  Upon the conviction of the person depicted in the booking photo, if the  conviction re-
sults from the arrest during which the booking photo was obtained.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Booking photo” means a  photograph of a person taken by a law enforcement agency for
identification purposes when the person is booked into custody.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.915.
(c) “Law enforcement officer”  means an officer, deputy, member or employee of a law enforce-
ment agency.
SECTION 9.
(1) Section 2 of this 2021 Act, the amendments to ORS 135.235, 135.240,
135.245 and 135.247 by sections 3 to 6 of  this 2021 Act and the repeal of ORS 135.242 by section
7 of this 2021 Act become operative July 1, 2022.
(2) The Judicial Department may take any action before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to  enable the department to exercise, on or
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the department by section 2 of this 2021 Act, the amendments to
ORS 135.235, 135.240, 135.245 and 135.247  by sections 3 to 6 of this 2021 Act and the repeal of
ORS 135.242 by section 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
to the Judicial Department  by section 1 (2), chapter , Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations, is increased by
$2,210,910, for the purpose of implementing this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 48 (SB 48-C) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 48 (SB 48-C) Page 6